Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE A. DEPARTMENT OF STATE HEALTH SERVICES

CHAPTER 13. DEPARTMENT HOSPITALS AND RESPIRATORY FACILITIES

SUBCHAPTER A. CARE AND TREATMENT IN DEPARTMENT HOSPITALS

Sec. 13.002. ADMISSION OF OTHER PATIENTS. (a) The department may admit to any hospital under its supervision a patient who:

(1) is eligible to receive patient services under a department program; and

(2) will benefit from hospitalization.

(b) Admission to a hospital as authorized under this section is subject to the availability of:

(1) appropriate space after the needs of eligible tuberculosis and chronic respiratory disease patients have been met; and

(2) trained medical personnel for the necessary medical care and treatment.

(c) The executive commissioner may adopt rules and the department may enter into contracts as necessary to implement this section.

(d) This section does not require the executive commissioner or department to:

(1) admit a patient to a particular hospital;

(2) guarantee the availability of space at any hospital; or

(3) provide treatment for a particular medical need at any hospital.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0049, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 13.003. SERVICES AT RIO GRANDE STATE CENTER. (a) The primary purpose of the Rio Grande State Center is to provide inpatient and outpatient services, either directly or by contract with one or more public or private health care providers or entities, to the residents of the Lower Rio Grande Valley.

(b) The department may establish at the Rio Grande State Center:

(1) cancer screening;

(2) diagnostic services;

(3) educational services;

(4) obstetrical services;

(5) gynecological services;

(6) other inpatient health care services; and

(7) outpatient health care services, including diagnostic, treatment, disease management, and supportive care services.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1106, Sec. 9, eff. Aug. 30, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 263, Sec. 2, eff. May 22, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 650 (H.B. 1850), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0050, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 13.004. TREATMENT OF CERTAIN PERSONS WITH MENTAL ILLNESS OR AN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY. (a) The department or the Department of Aging and Disability Services, as appropriate, may transfer a person with mental illness or an intellectual disability who is infected with tuberculosis to a public health hospital as defined by Section 13.033.

(b) The person may be transferred without that person's consent.

(c) The cost of maintaining and treating the person at the Texas Center for Infectious Disease shall be paid from appropriations to that hospital.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0051, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0052, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 13.005. CARE AND TREATMENT OF CERTAIN PATIENTS. (a) The department shall fully develop essential services needed for the control of tuberculosis. To provide those services, the department may contract for the support, maintenance, care, and treatment of tuberculosis patients:

(1) admitted to facilities under the department's jurisdiction; or

(2) otherwise subject to the department's jurisdiction.

(b) The department may contract with:

(1) municipal, county, or state hospitals;

(2) private physicians;

(3) licensed nursing facilities and hospitals; and

(4) hospital districts.

(c) The department may contract for diagnostic and other services available in a community or region as necessary to prevent further spread of tuberculosis.

(d) A contract may not include the assignment of any lien accruing to the state.

(e) The department may establish and operate outpatient clinics as necessary to provide follow-up treatment on discharged patients. A person who receives treatment as an outpatient is financially liable in the manner provided for inpatients.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0053, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 13.006. PURPOSE OF TUBERCULOSIS CONTROL PROGRAM. The primary objectives of the tuberculosis control program are:

(1) case-finding;

(2) inpatient and outpatient treatment; and

(3) the eventual eradication of tuberculosis.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 13.007. COLONEL H. WILLIAM "BILL" CARD, JR., OUTPATIENT CLINIC. The outpatient clinic operated by the South Texas Health Care System in Harlingen, Texas, is named the Colonel H. William "Bill" Card, Jr., Outpatient Clinic in honor of Colonel H. William "Bill" Card, Jr.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1056 (H.B. 4642), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1118 (S.B. 1926), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. TEXAS TUBERCULOSIS CODE

Sec. 13.031. SHORT TITLE. This subchapter may be cited as the Texas Tuberculosis Code.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 13.032. PURPOSE. The purpose of this subchapter is to:

(1) enable persons with tuberculosis to obtain needed care;

(2) provide care and treatment for those persons; and

(3) facilitate their hospitalization.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 13.033. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Legally responsible person" means a parent, guardian, or spouse, or any person whom the laws of this state hold responsible for debts incurred as a result of the hospitalization or treatment of a patient.

(2) "Local health authority" means a practicing physician who acts as:

(A) a municipal or county health authority;

(B) a director of a local health department or public health district; or

(C) a regional director of a public health region.

(3) "Physician" means a person licensed by the Texas Medical Board to practice medicine in this state.

(4) "Political subdivision" includes a county, municipality, or hospital district.

(5) "Public health hospital" means a hospital operated by the department to provide services under this subchapter, including the Texas Center for Infectious Disease.

(6) "Tuberculosis patient" means a person who has any form of tuberculosis in any part of the body.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 263, Sec. 3, eff. May 22, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 650 (H.B. 1850), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0054, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 13.034. DUTIES OF EXECUTIVE COMMISSIONER AND DEPARTMENT. (a) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules relating to:

(1) the management of public health hospitals;

(2) the duties of officers and employees of those hospitals; and

(3) the enforcement of necessary discipline and restraint of patients.

(a-1) The executive commissioner may adopt rules as necessary for the proper and efficient hospitalization of tuberculosis patients.

(b) The department shall supply each hospital with the necessary personnel for the operation and maintenance of the hospital.

(c) The department may:

(1) prescribe the form and content of applications, certificates, records, and reports provided for under this subchapter;

(2) require reports from the administrator of a public health hospital relating to the admission, examination, diagnosis, release, or discharge of a patient;

(3) visit each hospital regularly to review admitting procedures and the care and treatment of all new patients admitted since the last visit; and

(4) investigate by personal visit a complaint made by a patient or by another person on behalf of a patient.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0055, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 13.035. EMPLOYMENT OF HOSPITAL ADMINISTRATORS. (a) The department shall employ a qualified hospital administrator for each public health hospital.

(b) A hospital administrator employed under this section is not required to be a licensed physician.

(c) The hospital administrator may delegate a power or duty of the administrator to an employee. The delegation does not relieve the hospital administrator from the responsibility.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0056, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 13.036. PATIENT ADMISSION; EXAMINATION CERTIFICATE. (a) A resident of this state who has tuberculosis may be admitted to a public health hospital. A person who is not a resident of this state and who has tuberculosis may be admitted to a public health hospital in accordance with Section 13.046.

(b) The hospital shall review applications for admission and admit or deny admission to applicants.

(c) An application for admission to a public health hospital shall be accompanied by a certificate issued by a physician stating that the physician has thoroughly examined the applicant and that the applicant has tuberculosis. In the case of an applicant who is not a resident of this state, the certificate may be issued by a physician who holds a license to practice medicine in the state of residence of the applicant.

(d) In the case of an indigent applicant, the certificate may be issued by the local health authority.

(e) The department shall prescribe the form and content of the certificate.

(f) If the applicant has a communicable disease other than tuberculosis, the hospital administrator may delay the admission until the other disease is no longer contagious.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0057, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 13.037. DETERMINATION OF RESIDENCY. (a) A person is a resident of this state if the person:

(1) is physically present and living voluntarily in this state;

(2) intends to make a home in this state; and

(3) is not in this state temporarily.

(b) The intent to make a home in this state may be demonstrated by proof similar to or including:

(1) the possession of documentation, such as a Texas driver's license, motor vehicle registration, or voter registration certificate;

(2) the presence of personal effects at a specific abode in this state; or

(3) employment in this state.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 13.038. CLASSIFICATION OF PATIENTS; LIEN. (a) A patient admitted to a public health hospital is a public patient and classified as indigent, nonindigent, or nonresident.

(b) An indigent public patient is a person who:

(1) does not possess property of any kind;

(2) has no person who is legally responsible for the patient's support; and

(3) is unable to reimburse the state.

(c) A nonindigent public patient is a person who possesses property out of which the state may be reimbursed, or who has a person who is legally responsible for the patient's support.

(d) Except as provided by Section 13.040, the state shall support and maintain an indigent or nonindigent public patient at state expense but is entitled to reimbursement for a nonindigent public patient's support.

(e) The state's claim for nonindigent support and maintenance constitutes a lien against the property of the patient or the legally responsible person who is financially able to contribute.

(f) A nonresident public patient is a person who is admitted in accordance with an interstate agreement under Section 13.046.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0058, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 13.039. COLLECTION OF STATE'S CLAIM. (a) A state claim for patient support and maintenance may be collected through an action brought against the patient or the person legally responsible for the patient. The action shall be brought in the county from which the patient was sent and shall be brought in the name of the state by the county or district attorney of that county or by the attorney general.

(b) The action shall be brought on the written request of the public health hospital administrator, accompanied by a certificate as to the amount owed to the state. In any action, the certificate is sufficient evidence of the amount owed to the state for the support of that patient.

(c) On receipt of the request, the attorney shall bring and conduct the suit and is entitled to a commission of 10 percent of the amount collected. All money collected under this section, less the amount of the commission, shall be paid by the attorney to the hospital administrator, who shall receive the amount and give a receipt.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0059, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 13.040. EFFECT OF INDIGENT HEALTH CARE AND TREATMENT ACT. If an indigent or nonindigent public patient is eligible for health care assistance from a county hospital or public hospital under Chapter 61 (Indigent Health Care and Treatment Act), the state is entitled to reimbursement from that hospital for the treatment and support of the patient to the extent prescribed by that chapter.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 13.041. RETURN OF CERTAIN NONRESIDENTS; RECIPROCAL AGREEMENTS. (a) The department may:

(1) return a nonresident patient admitted to a public health hospital to the proper agency of the state of the patient's residence; and

(2) permit the return of a resident of this state who has been admitted to a tuberculosis hospital in another state.

(b) The state that is returning a patient shall pay the expenses of the return.

(c) The department may enter into reciprocal agreements with the proper agencies of other states to facilitate the return to the states of their residence of nonresident patients admitted to tuberculosis hospitals in other states.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0060, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 13.042. DISCRIMINATION PROHIBITED. (a) A public health hospital may not discriminate against a patient.

(b) Each patient is entitled to equal facilities, attention, and treatment. However, a public health hospital may provide different care and treatment of patients because of differences in the condition of the individual patients.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0061, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 13.043. GRATUITIES PROHIBITED. (a) A patient in a public health hospital may not offer an officer, agent, or employee of the hospital a tip, payment, or reward of any kind.

(b) A patient who violates this section may be expelled from the hospital. An employee who accepts a tip, payment, or reward of any kind from a patient may be discharged.

(c) The department shall strictly enforce this section.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0062, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 13.044. PRIVATE ACCOMMODATIONS. (a) On the request of any charitable organization in this state, the department may permit the erection, furnishing, and maintenance by the charitable organization of accommodations on the grounds of a public health hospital for persons who have tuberculosis and who are:

(1) members of the charitable organization;

(2) members of the families of persons who are members of the charitable organization; or

(3) surviving spouses or minor children of deceased persons who are members of the charitable organization.

(b) The accommodations shall be reserved for the preferential use of persons described by Subsection (a).

(c) The state may not incur any expense in the erection, furnishing, and maintenance of the accommodations. The charitable organization that enters a patient under this section may be required to pay the pro rata part of the maintenance costs of that patient that is found to be just and equitable, pending the next legislative appropriation for the maintenance of state chest hospitals. Any part of the accommodations not used by persons described by Subsection (a) may be used, at the discretion of the hospital administrator, by other patients in the hospital without charge to the state.

(d) The officers or a board or committee of the charitable organization and the department must enter into a written agreement relating to the location, construction, style, and character, and terms of existence of buildings, and other questions arising in connection with the grant of permission to erect and maintain private accommodations. The department must maintain as a record a copy of the written agreement.

(e) Except for the preferential right to occupy vacant accommodations erected by the person's charitable organization, a person described by Subsection (a) shall be classified in the same manner as other public health hospital patients and shall be admitted, maintained, cared for, and treated in those hospitals in the same manner and under the same conditions and rules that apply to other patients.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0063, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 13.045. DONATION OF LAND BY COUNTY. (a) A county may donate and convey land to the state in consideration of the establishment of a public health hospital by the executive commissioner.

(b) The commissioners court of the county may determine the desirability, manner, and form of the donation and conveyance.

(c) This section does not authorize the commissioners court of a county to convey land donated or granted for educational purposes to the county in any manner other than that directed by law.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0064, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 13.046. ADMISSION OF NONRESIDENT PATIENTS. (a) The department may enter into an agreement with an agency of another state responsible for the care of residents of that state who have tuberculosis under which:

(1) residents of the other state who have tuberculosis may be admitted to a public health hospital, subject to the availability of appropriate space after the needs of eligible tuberculosis and chronic respiratory disease patients who are residents of this state have been met; and

(2) the other state is responsible for paying all costs of the hospitalization and treatment of patients admitted under the agreement.

(b) Section 13.041 does not apply to the return of a nonresident patient admitted to a public health hospital in accordance with an agreement entered into under this section. The return of that patient to the state of residence is governed by the agreement.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0065, eff. April 2, 2015.